Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.37
Target housing, defined.

Target housing means any housing constructed prior to 1978, except housing for the elderly or persons with disabilities unless one or more children six years of age or under resides or is expected to reside in such housing for the elderly or persons with disabilities or any zero-bedroom dwelling.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 39.